Maryland, session 2026, HB0680.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
8–417.
(b) (1) The Department, in collaboration with the fiscal agent of the Children’s
Cabinet INTERAGENCY Fund under Title 8, Subtitle 5 of the Human Services Article, shall
administer and implement a redesigned rate setting process for nonpublic general
education schools, residential child care programs, and nonresidential child care programs.
Article – Health – General
15–139.
(c) (1) For each fiscal year, the Governor may provide funds in the budget for
the Children’s Cabinet INTERAGENCY Fund established under Title 8, Subtitle 5 of the
Human Services Article, to be used by the Children’s Cabinet to create an interagency pool
of funds to provide services to children with disabilities.
Article – Human Services
Subtitle 5. Children’s Cabinet INTERAGENCY Fund.

HOUSE BILL 680 3
8–501.
In this subtitle, “Fund” means the Children’s Cabinet INTERAGENCY Fund.
8–502.
There is a Children’s Cabinet INTERAGENCY Fund.
8–503.
(a) The Fund:
(1) consists of money appropriated, transferred, credited, or paid into the
Fund from any source; and
(2) includes money for out–of–home care and services to prevent
out–of–home placements.
(b) At the end of each fiscal year any unspent money in the Fund shall revert to
the General Fund.
(C) (1) THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL
THE FOLLOWING APPROPRIATIONS FOR THE FUND TO BE USED FOR GRANTS TO
ELIGIBLE LOCAL MANAGEMENT BOARDS:
(I) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, $3,000,000 $1,000,000 ABOVE THE
APPROPRIATION TO THE FUND IN FISCAL YEAR 2027;
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029, $2,000,000 $500,000 ABOVE THE
APPROPRIATION TO THE FUND IN FISCAL YEAR 2028;
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030, $2,000,000 $500,000 ABOVE THE
APPROPRIATION TO THE FUND IN FISCAL YEAR 2029; AND
(IV) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2028 THROUGH 2030, AN
APPROPRIATION AT LEAST EQUAL TO THE APPROPRIATION TO THE FUND IN FISCAL
YEAR 2027; AND
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031, $2,000,000 $500,000 ABOVE THE
APPROPRIATION TO THE FUND IN FISCAL YEAR 2030.
(2) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE
LOCAL MANAGEMENT BOARDS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS
SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT

HOUSE BILL 680
OTHERWISE WOULD BE EXPENDED FOR GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE LOCAL MANAGEMENT
BOARDS.
8–504.
Expenditures from the Fund shall be made:
(1) in accordance with the State Finance and Procurement Article; and
(2) to reflect the priorities, policies, and procedures that the Children’s
Cabinet adopts.
8–505.
(a) A local management board shall apply for money from the Fund in accordance
with procedures established by the Children’s Cabinet.
(b) In connection with an application for money under subsection (a) of this
section, a local management board shall develop and submit a community partnership
agreement that:
(1) reflects coordination with:
(i) the State’s 3–year plan for children, youth, and families; and
(ii) any local government plan for services for children, youth, and
families, including the local substance abuse plan developed in accordance with Title 8,
Subtitle 10 of the Health – General Article; and
(2) addresses the priorities and strategies of the county for meeting the
identified needs of children and families as articulated in the local management board’s
5–year strategic plan regarding:
(i) youth development;
(ii) prevention services;
(iii) crisis and early intervention;
(iv) services for children at risk of out–of–home placement or
returning from out–of–home placement; and
(v) out–of–home placement and treatment.
(c) The Children’s Cabinet may disburse money to a local management board
subject to the terms, conditions, performance measures, or outcome evaluations that the
Children’s Cabinet considers necessary.

HOUSE BILL 680 5
(d) The local management board shall use the money to implement:
(1) a local interagency services delivery system for children, youth, and
families in accordance with the community partnership agreement; and
(2) any terms, conditions, and performance measures that the Children’s
Cabinet requires.
8–506.
(a) The State shall fund only evidence–based and promising home visiting
programs for improving parent and child outcomes, as provided in the State budget.
(b) Not less than 75% of the State funding for home visiting programs shall be
made available to evidence–based home visiting programs.
8–508.
The Governor’s Office for Children is the fiscal agent for the Fund.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.